apertium-azz.azz.lexc
LEXICON V-SI-PROG

%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<pres%>:%{j%}%>to%>k           V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%{j%}%>to%>s            V-AGR-FUTR;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%{j%}%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a  V-AGR-PRES;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<impf%>:%{j%}%>to%>ya          V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:%{j%}%>t                               V-AUX-II ;

%<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;


LEXICON V-SI-FUTR

%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AUX-I ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cni%>:%>s%>kia                        V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cnt%>:%>ni                            V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<opt%>:                                V-AGR-OPT ;
! %<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-S-PRES 

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:                               V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pp%>:%>ni                             V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-S-PRET

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:%{j%}%>%{k%}                   V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<plu%>:%{j%}%>ka                       V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-S-IMPF

%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-S-PROG

%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<pres%>:%{j%}%>to%>k           V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%{j%}%>to%>s            V-AGR-FUTR;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%{j%}%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a  V-AGR-PRES;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<impf%>:%{j%}%>to%>ya          V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<iv%>:%{j%}%>t                               V-AUX-II ;

%<v%>%<iv%>:                                       V-DIR ;


LEXICON V-S-FUTR

%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AUX-I ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:%>s%>kia                        V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<cnt%>:%>ni                            V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<opt%>:                                V-AGR-OPT ;
! %<v%>%<iv%>:                                       V-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-Ø-PRES

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pres%>:                               V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-Ø-PRET

%<v%>%<iv%>%<pret%>:%{j%}%>%{k%}                   V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<plu%>:%{j%}%>ka                            V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-Ø-IMPF

%<v%>%<iv%>%<impf%>:%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-Ø-PROG

%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<pres%>:%{j%}%>to%>k           V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%{j%}%>to%>s            V-AGR-FUTR;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%{j%}%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a  V-AGR-PRES;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<prog%>%<impf%>:%{j%}%>to%>ya          V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<iv%>:%{j%}%>t                               V-AUX-II ;

%<v%>%<iv%>:                                       V-DIR ;


LEXICON V-Ø-FUTR

%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AUX-I ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<cni%>:%>s%>kia                        V-AGR-PRES ;
! %<v%>%<iv%>:                                       V-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-AUX-I

%+neki%<vaux%>%<pres%>:%>neki                      V-AGR-PRES ;
%+neki%<vaux%>%<impf%>:%>neki%>%{y%}a              V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-AUX-II

%+huits%<vaux%>:i%>huits                           V-AGR-PRES ;
%+huala%<vaux%>%<fut%>:i%>hualas                   V-AGR-PRES ;
%+huala%<vaux%>%<pret%>:i%>hualaj                  V-AGR-PRES ;
%+yohui%<vaux%>:i%>yohuej                          V-AGR-PRES ;
%+yohui%<vaux%>:i%>huej                            V-AGR-PRES ;
%+yohui%<vaux%>%<impf%>:i%>yaya                    V-AGR-PRES ;
%+yohui%<vaux%>%<pret%>:i%>yajki                   V-AGR-PRES ;
%+ejko%<vaux%>:%>ejko                              V-AGR-PRES ;
%+ajsi%<vaux%>:%>ajsi                              V-AGR-PRES ;
%+ehua%<vaux%>:%>ehua                              V-AGR-PRES ;
%+kisa%<vaux%>:i%>kisa                             V-AGR-PRES ;
%+huetsi%<vaux%>:i%>huets                          V-AGR-HUETSI ;
%+nemi%<vaux%>:i%>nemi                             V-AGR-PRES ;

   
LEXICON V-DIR

%<ven%>:%>ki                                       V-AGR-PRES ;
%<and%>:%>ti                                       V-AGR-PRES ;
%<ven%>:%>ko                                       V-AGR-OPT ;
%<and%>:%>to                                       V-AGR-OPT ;

LEXICON V-AGR-HUETSI

@D.PLUR@:@D.PLUR@i                                 # ; 
@R.PLUR.1@:@R.PLUR.1@%>kej                         # ; 

LEXICON V-AGR-PRET

@D.PLUR@:@D.PLUR@                                  # ; 
@R.PLUR.1@:@R.PLUR.1@%>ej                          # ; 

LEXICON V-AGR-PRES 

@D.PLUR@:@D.PLUR@                                  # ; 
@R.PLUR.1@:@R.PLUR.1@%>j                           # ; 

LEXICON V-AGR-FUTR

@D.PLUR@:@D.PLUR@                                  # ; 
@R.PLUR.1@:@R.PLUR.1@%>kej                         # ; 

LEXICON V-AGR-OPT
# ;
@R.PLUR.1@:@R.PLUR.1@%>kan                         # ; 


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON COP-KATKA
%<cop%>:                                           V-AGR-PRES ;


LEXICON COP
%<cop%>:%{j%}%>to%>k                               V-AGR-PRET ;
%<cop%>%<impf%>:%>to%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;
%<cop%>%<fut%>:%>ski                               V-AGR-PRES ; 
%<cop%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%>to%>s                     V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<cop%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a           V-AGR-PRES ;
%<cop%>%<cni%>:%>ski%{y%}a                         V-AGR-PRES ;
%<cop%>%<opt%>:%>tok%>an                           # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NO-POSS

@D.POSS@:@D.POSS@                                  # ;

LEXICON N-REL

@R.POSS.1@%<n%>%<rel%>:@R.POSS.1@                  # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                         # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsitsin                # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>%<loc%>:%>tsin%>ko              # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:%>tsitsin%>ko     # ;

LEXICON N-LOC

%<n%>%<rel%>:                                      # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                         # ;
%<n%>%<rel%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsitsin                # ;

LEXICON N-TL 

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>t                                   NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                  # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>j                                    # ; ! 
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-PL-REDUP

%<n%>%<pl%>:                                       # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsin                          # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-TLI

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>ti                                  NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                  # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-Ø

%<n%>%<abs%>:%>                                    NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>mej                                  # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON N-OYAN

%<n%>%<abs%>:                                      NO-POSS ;
%<n%>:                                             N-POSS ;
%<n%>%<hon%>:%>tsin                                # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:i%>mej                                 # ;
%<n%>%<hon%>%<pl%>:%>tsi%>tsin                     # ;
%<n%>%<cmp%>%+:                                    CMPND ;

LEXICON SO
ita%<v%>%<tv%>:%{i%}ts                              V-DIR ;
LEXICON SI
servirohua:serviro                                  V-SI-PROG ;
servirohua:serviro                                  V-SI-FUTR ;
talilia:talili                                      V-SI-PROG ;
talilia:talili                                      V-SI-FUTR ;
tamota:tamota                                       V-SI-PROG ;
tamota:tamota                                       V-SI-FUTR ;
tahuelia:tahuelia                                   V-SI-PROG ;
tahuelia:tahueli                                    V-SI-FUTR ;
tapana:tapana                                       V-SI-PROG ;
tapana:tapana                                       V-SI-FUTR ;
takiltia:takilti                                    V-SI-PROG ;
takiltia:takilti                                    V-SI-FUTR ;
LEXICON S
kostia:kostia                                       V-S-PRES ;
kostia:kostia                                       V-S-IMPF ;
kostia:kosti                                        V-S-PROG ;
kostia:kosti                                        V-S-PRET ;
kostia:kosti                                        V-S-FUTR ;
potoni:potoni                                       V-S-IMPF ;
potoni:potoni                                       V-S-PROG ;
potoni:potoni                                       V-S-FUTR ;
poyeya:poyeya                                       V-S-PRES ;
poyeya:poyeya                                       V-S-PRET ;
tanesi:tanesi                                       V-S-IMPF ;
ixpetani:ixpetani                                   V-S-PRES ;
ixpetani:ixpetani                                   V-S-PRET ;
huejkapantia:huejkapantia                             V-S-IMPF ; ! ""
huejkapantia:huejkapantia                             V-S-PROG ; ! ""
huejkapantia:huejkapantia                             V-S-FUTR ; ! ""
huejuelihui:huejuelihui                               V-S-PRES ; ! "descomponerse"
huejuelihui:huejuelihui                               V-S-PRET ; ! "descomponerse"
nakasikayohui:nakasikayohui                           V-S-IMPF ; ! ""
nakasikayohui:nakasikayohui                           V-S-PROG ; ! ""
nakasikayohui:nakasikayohui                           V-S-FUTR ; ! ""
naluayohua:naluayohua                                 V-S-PRES ; ! "enraizarse"
naluayohua:naluayohua                                 V-S-PRET ; ! "enraizarse"
tenkokotoka:tenkokotoka                               V-S-IMPF ; ! ""
tenkokotoka:tenkokotoka                               V-S-PROG ; ! ""
tenkokotoka:tenkokotoka                               V-S-FUTR ; ! ""
tentami:tentami                                       V-S-PRES ; ! ""
tentami:tentami                                       V-S-PRET ; ! ""
LEXICON Comunes 
pajti:paj                                           N-TLI ; ! "medicina"
tepet:tepe                                          N-TL ; ! "montaña"
tejtepet:tejtepe                                    N-PL-REDUP ; ! "cerros"
huauhkilit:huauh%>kili                              N-TL ; ! ""
tahmachkamisa:tahmachkamisa                         N-Ø ; ! "camisa bordada"
mixti:mix                                           N-TLI ; ! "nube"
nexuitil:nexuitil                                   N-Ø ; ! "empacho"
iluit:ilui                                          N-TL ; ! "fiesta"
sinti:sin                                           N-TLI ; ! "mazorca"
oloxochit:olo%>xochi                                N-TL ; ! ""
tato:tato                                           N-Ø ; ! "señor"
panti:pan                                           N-TLI ; ! "culparle"
achti:ach                                           N-TLI ; ! "semilla"
tanesi:tanesi                                       N-Ø ; ! "amanecer"
omit:omi                                            N-TL ; ! "hueso"
tanej:tanej                                         N-Ø ; ! "dentado"
kalnemachtiloyan:kalnemachtiloyan                   N-OYAN ; ! "escuela"
tanamakaloyan:tanamakaloyan                         N-OYAN ; ! "tienda"
kaltapajtiloyan:kaltapajtiloyan                     N-OYAN ; ! "hospital"
